Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 58

Resource Recovery and Solid Waste Disposal

7-58-101. Chapter definitions — Approval of systems.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Approved system” means a solid waste disposal facility that has as its primary purpose the creation and recovery of energy from solid waste, as defined in subdivision (a)(4), and has as a secondary or incidental purpose the recovery of recyclable commodities, and which facility has been approved by the department of environment and conservation under authority granted to it by title 68, chapter 211;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Resource recovery” means the recovery of material physically and economically suitable for further processing, recycling, and ultimate reuse; and

“Solid waste” means all municipal, commercial, or industrial solid waste normally collected and disposed of by local governments, such as garbage, rubbish, refuse, and other such similar and related materials, except those excluded by the department, which shall designate as “special waste” any hazardous or other waste it determines should not be processed in an approved system for reasons of public health or safety, or because the nature of the waste is such that it is not suitable for processing in an approved system, and such materials as are normally collected or accepted by private industry for the purpose of recycling and are not normally collected or accepted by local governments.

The department shall approve, under the terms of this chapter, any system that:

Is planned to handle solid waste in a manner compatible with the public health and safety;

Converts a substantial percentage of solid waste into fuel; and

Conserves resources.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-4108.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1 provided that throughout this chapter, former references to the commissioner or the department of health, health and environment, or public health, were to be amended to become references to the commissioner or department of environment and conservation.

Cross-References. Authority of not-for-profit corporations acting under energy production facilities law and this chapter, §7-54-111.

7-58-102. Authority to participate.

The counties, cities, and towns of Tennessee are hereby authorized to participate in applicable approved local, joint or regional solid waste recovery disposal systems.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4101.

Cross-References. Solid waste disposal, title 68, ch. 211.

7-58-103. Contracting with operators of approved systems.

Whenever the operator of an approved system proposes to take the solid wastes collected by the counties, cities and towns of Tennessee for the purpose of resource and fuel recovery, such counties, cities and towns are authorized, wherever the resource and fuel recovery is found to be desirable by the governing body of such political subdivision, to contract for the delivery of solid wastes to such operator at a designated processing plant or transfer station, including a transfer station constructed and operated by local government or private industry.

The term of any contract authorized by this section may extend beyond the elected term of the members of the governing body of such political subdivision, but in no event may such term exceed forty (40) years.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 2; 1979, ch. 266, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-4102.

Code Commission Notes.

Section 4 of Acts 1979, ch. 266, which was effective May 9, 1979, provided that all existing contracts heretofore entered into in compliance with this section or §7-58-104, as amended by sections 2 and 3 of that act, were thereby ratified, validated and affirmed.

7-58-104. Contracting with other counties, cities and towns.

The counties, cities and towns of Tennessee in any combination are authorized to contract with each other for purposes of cooperative solid waste operations under the terms of this chapter.

The term of any contract authorized by this section may extend beyond the elected term of the members of the governing body of the counties, cities or towns involved, but in no event may such term exceed forty (40) years.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 3; 1979, ch. 266, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-4103.

Code Commission Notes.

Section 4 of Acts 1979, ch. 266, which was effective May 9, 1979; provided, that all existing contracts heretofore entered into in compliance with §7-58-103 or this section, as amended by sections 2 and 3 of that act, were thereby ratified, validated and affirmed.

7-58-105. Out-of-state hauling — Regulations applying to inbound waste.

Wherever the location of processing plants shall require local governments to haul solid wastes across state lines, such out-of-state hauling is hereby declared to be authorized and to be a valid exercise of the authority of the local governments involved, and likewise solid wastes from out-of-state may be brought into the state of Tennessee for processing in approved systems, such inbound solid waste to be subject to the same handling standards and regulations as solid waste produced within the state.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-4104.

7-58-106. Property rights in waste.

The solid wastes involved shall become the lawful property of the local governments involved at the point of collection, and in the absence of contractual provisions to the contrary, shall become the property of the operator of an approved system upon delivery to such operator, whether delivery be at a transfer station or at a processing plant.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-4105.

7-58-107. Construction and operation of transfer stations.

The participating local governments may agree to, build and operate the required transfer stations of such types and at such locations within the state as may be agreed upon by the local governments involved and by the department, and that state solid waste grant-in-aid funds made available to local governments by title 68, chapter 211, are authorized to be used for the construction of such approved transfer stations.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-4106.

7-58-108. Assistance of department.

The department is authorized to assist any operator or potential operator of an approved system and the local governments involved in the design and location of required transfer stations, and in the design and location of sanitary landfills or other disposal facilities in connection with the transfer stations to dispose of special waste.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-4107.

7-58-109. Construction — Supplementary nature of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit local governments or private enterprise from the construction or operation of approved sanitary landfills, or of any other heretofore or hereafter approved solid waste disposal system, it being the intent of this chapter that its provisions shall be supplementary to, and not restrictive of, any previously authorized solid waste disposal system, facility, or operation, nor of any other such system, facility or operation that may be authorized in the future. Nor shall this chapter be interpreted as granting any regulatory authority to the department that is not otherwise granted in other statutes.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4109.

7-58-110. Construction — Activities not prohibited.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit private enterprise or other agencies from the construction or operation of recycling plants, or to prohibit the sale or gift of solid wastes to private enterprise or other agencies by local governments.

Acts 1976, ch. 488, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-4110.